dics/ru/ru_RU.aff
SFX M Y 108
SFX M   чься кутся        чься
SFX M   чься кусь         чься
SFX M   чь   кут          чь
SFX M   чь   ку           чь
SFX M   ыться оешься       ыться
SFX M   ыться оется        ыться
SFX M   ыться оетесь       ыться
SFX M   ыться оемся        ыться
SFX M   ыться оются        ыться
SFX M   ыться оюсь         ыться
SFX M   ыть  оешь         ыть
SFX M   ыть  оете         ыть
SFX M   ыть  оет          ыть
SFX M   ыть  оем          ыть
SFX M   ыть  оют          ыть
SFX M   ыть  ою           ыть
SFX M   ься  ся           уться
SFX M   ься  ешься        чься
SFX M   ься  ется         чься
SFX M   ься  етесь        чься
SFX M   ься  емся         чься
SFX M   ься  ёшься        чься
SFX M   ься  ётся         чься
SFX M   ься  ётесь        чься
SFX M   ься  ёмся         чься
SFX M   ь    ешь          чь
SFX M   ь    ете          чь
SFX M   ь    ет           чь
SFX M   ь    ем           чь
SFX M   ь    ёшь          чь
SFX M   ь    ёте          чь
SFX M   ь    ёт           чь
SFX M   ь    ём           чь
SFX M   уться ешься        уться
SFX M   уться ется         уться
SFX M   уться етесь        уться
SFX M   уться емся         уться
SFX M   уть  у            уть
SFX M   уть  ешь          уть
SFX M   уть  ете          уть
SFX M   уть  ет           уть
SFX M   уть  ем           уть
SFX M   ться сь           уться
SFX M   ться ешься        [ае]ться
SFX M   ться ется         [ае]ться
SFX M   ться етесь        [ае]ться
SFX M   ться емся         [ае]ться
SFX M   ться ются         [ае]ться
SFX M   ться юсь          [ае]ться
SFX M   ть   т            уть
SFX M   ть   ешь          [ае]ть
SFX M   ть   ете          [ае]ть
SFX M   ть   ет           [ае]ть
SFX M   ть   ем           [ае]ть
SFX M   ть   ют           [ае]ть
SFX M   ть   ю            [ае]ть
SFX M   тись утся         [сз]тись
SFX M   тись усь          [сз]тись
SFX M   тись ешься        [сз]тись
SFX M   тись ется         [сз]тись
SFX M   тись етесь        [сз]тись
SFX M   тись емся         [сз]тись
SFX M   тись дутся        йтись
SFX M   тись дусь         йтись
SFX M   тись дешься       йтись
SFX M   тись дется        йтись
SFX M   тись детесь       йтись
SFX M   тись демся        йтись
SFX M   тись дёшься       йтись
SFX M   тись дётся        йтись
SFX M   тись дётесь       йтись
SFX M   тись дёмся        йтись
SFX M   тись ёшься        [сз]тись
SFX M   тись ётся         [сз]тись
SFX M   тись ётесь        [сз]тись
SFX M   тись ёмся         [сз]тись
SFX M   ти   ут           [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   у            [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ешь          [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ете          [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ет           [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ем           [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   дут          йти
SFX M   ти   ду           йти
SFX M   ти   дешь         йти
SFX M   ти   дете         йти
SFX M   ти   дет          йти
SFX M   ти   дем          йти
SFX M   ти   дёшь         йти
SFX M   ти   дёте         йти
SFX M   ти   дёт          йти
SFX M   ти   дём          йти
SFX M   ти   ёшь          [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ёте          [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ёт           [сз]ти
SFX M   ти   ём           [сз]ти
SFX M   оться ешься        оться
SFX M   оться ется         оться
SFX M   оться етесь        оться
SFX M   оться емся         оться
SFX M   оться ются         оться
SFX M   оться юсь          оться
SFX M   оть  ешь          оть
SFX M   оть  ете          оть
SFX M   оть  ет           оть
SFX M   оть  ем           оть
SFX M   оть  ют           оть
SFX M   оть  ю            оть

SFX L Y 63
SFX L   чься кся          чься
SFX L   чься кся          [^е]чься
SFX L   чься клось        чься
SFX L   чься клись        чься
SFX L   чься клась        чься
SFX L   чь   кло          чь
SFX L   чь   кли          чь
SFX L   чь   кла          чь
SFX L   чь   к            чь
SFX L   чь   к            [^е]чь
SFX L   зть  з            зть
SFX L   зти  з            зти
SFX L   ться ся           зться
SFX L   ться лся          [^сз]ться
SFX L   ться лось         [^с]ться
SFX L   ться лись         [^с]ться
SFX L   ться лась         [^с]ться
SFX L   ть   ло           [^с]ть
SFX L   ть   ли           [^с]ть
SFX L   ть   ла           [^с]ть
SFX L   ть   л            [^сз]ть
SFX L   ти   ло           зти
SFX L   ти   ли           зти
SFX L   ти   ла           зти
SFX L   сться лся          сться
SFX L   сться лось         сться
SFX L   сться лись         сться
SFX L   сться лась         сться
SFX L   сть  ло           [^ч].сть
SFX L   сть  ли           [^ч].сть
SFX L   сть  ла           [^ч].сть
SFX L   сть  л            [^ч].сть
SFX L   стись лся          стись
SFX L   стись лся          [^е]стись
SFX L   стись лось         стись
SFX L   стись лись         стись
SFX L   стись лась         стись
SFX L   сти  ло           сти
SFX L   сти  ли           сти
SFX L   сти  ла           сти
SFX L   сти  л            сти
SFX L   сти  л            [^е]сти
SFX L   ся   лось         [^аияь]ся
SFX L   ся   лись         [^аияь]ся
SFX L   ся   лась         [^аияь]ся
SFX L   лзти лз           лзти
SFX L   ечься ёкся         ечься
SFX L   ечь  ёк           ечь
SFX L   езти ёз           езти
SFX L   есть ло           честь
SFX L   есть ли           честь
SFX L   есть ла           честь
SFX L   есть ел           честь
SFX L   есть ёл           честь
SFX L   естись ёлся         естись
SFX L   ести ёл           ести
SFX L   ась  ось          ась
SFX L   ась  ись          ась
SFX L   а    о            а
SFX L   а    и            а
SFX L   0    ло           [^аияь]
SFX L   0    ли           [^аияь]
SFX L   0    ла           [^аияь]

SFX K Y 55
SFX K   ще   щ            ще
SFX K   ье   ий           ье
SFX K   ь    ями          ь
SFX K   ь    ям           ь
SFX K   ь    ях           ь
SFX K   ь    я            ь
SFX K   ь    и            ь
SFX K   ь    ем           ь
SFX K   ь    ей           ь
SFX K   ь    е            ь
SFX K   ь    ю            ь
SFX K   о    у            о
SFX K   о    и            [ишч]ко
SFX K   о    е            о
SFX K   о    ами          о
SFX K   о    ам           о
SFX K   о    ах           о
SFX K   о    а            о
SFX K   о    0            [дгств]о
SFX K   й    ями          й
SFX K   й    ям           й
SFX K   й    ях           й
SFX K   й    я            й
SFX K   й    и            ий
SFX K   й    и            [юаеояу]й
SFX K   й    ев           й
SFX K   й    ем           й
SFX K   й    е            [^и]й
SFX K   й    ю            й
SFX K   е    у            [цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ями          [^цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ям           [^цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ях           [^цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    я            [^цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    й            ие
SFX K   е    и            ие
SFX K   е    ей           [^цижьщ]е
SFX K   е    ами          [цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ам           [цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ах           [цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    а            [цжшщ]е
SFX K   е    ю            [^цжшщ]е
SFX K   0    ы            [^егхйкожьшщч]
SFX K   0    у            [^ейоь]
SFX K   0    ов           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX K   0    ом           [^цейожьшщч]
SFX K   0    м            о
SFX K   0    м            е
SFX K   0    и            [гхкжшщч]
SFX K   0    ей           [жшщч]
SFX K   0    е            [^ейоь]
SFX K   0    ами          [^ейоь]
SFX K   0    ам           [^ейоь]
SFX K   0    ах           [^ейоь]
SFX K   0    а            [^ейоь]
